Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2012
81-12,161
Financial assistance program relating
to college or university research and development; established; funds; match
required; limitation.

(1) The department shall establish a financial assistance
program to provide financial assistance to businesses operating in Nebraska
that use the faculty or facilities of a public or private college or university
in Nebraska for applied research and development of new products or use intellectual
property generated at a public or private college or university in Nebraska.

(2) A business
may apply for up to two awards in any four-year period per project. The department
may provide up to one hundred thousand dollars for the first phase of a project.
If the first phase is successful and agreed-upon contractual requirements
are met during the first phase, the department may provide up to four hundred
thousand dollars for the second phase of the project.

(3) Funds shall be matched
by nonstate funds equivalent in money equal to one hundred percent of the
funds requested for both phases of the program. Matching funds may be from
any nonstate source, including private foundations, federal or local government
sources, quasi-governmental entities, or commercial lending institutions,
or any other funds whose source does not include funds appropriated by the
Legislature.

(4) The department shall not award more than three million dollars
per year for financial assistance under this section.

Laws 2011, LB387, § 10.
October 1, 2016